Washington statutes.
RCW 11.125.901

Federal law application—Federal electronic signatures in global and national commerce act—2016 c 209.

Chapter 209, Laws of 2016 modifies, limits, and supersedes the federal electronic signatures in global and national commerce act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 7001 et seq., but does not modify, limit, or supersede section 101(c) of that act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 7001(c), or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in section 103(b) of that act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 7003(b).

[ 2016 c 209 s 502.]